src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_/werden__vb_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:erde  POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:ir%>st POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ird  POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:erd%>en POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:erd%>t  POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:erd%>en POST-V_01 ;

:urd IND-PRT ;
:erd SUBJ-PRS ;
:urd%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT ;
+Imprt+Sg2:erde POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:erdet POST-V_01 ;

LEXICON V_/kommen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ kommen:k
+V:ommen  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_/kommen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:omm@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_/kommen__vb_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:omme  POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:omm%>st POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ommt  POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:omm%>en POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:omm%>t  POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:omm%>en POST-V_01 ;

:am IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:omm SUBJ-PRS ;
:am%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:omm POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:ommt POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_g/eben__vblex !!= * @CODE@ geben:gab
+V:%^A2E%>en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_g/eben__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:%^A2E@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_g/eben__vb_01
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2E SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2I POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2Et POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_spr/echen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ geben:gab
+V:%^A2O%>en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_spr/echen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:%^A2E@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_spr/echen__vb_01
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2E SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2I POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2E%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_g/elten__vblex !!= * @CODE@ gelten:galt
+V:%^A2O%>en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_g/elten__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:%^A2E@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_g/elten__vb_01
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-SG2 ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^A2I  POST-V_01 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2E SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2Ö SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2I POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2Et POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_tr/eten__vblex !!= * @CODE@ treten:tratt
+V:%^A2E%^CC2C%>en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_tr/eten__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:%^A2E%^CC2C@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_tr/eten__vb_01
:%^A2E%^CC2C  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2E%^CC2C IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2E%^CC2C  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2E%^CC2C IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:%^CC2C IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2E%^CC2C SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut%^CC2C SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2I POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2E%^CC2C%>et POST-V_01 ;

LEXICON V_g/ehen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ gehen:g
+V:angen  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_g/ehen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:eh@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_g/ehen__vb_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:eh%>e  POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:eh%>st POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:eht  POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:eh%>en POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:eh%>t  POST-V_01 ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:eh%>en POST-V_01 ;

:ing IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:eh SUBJ-PRS ;
:ing SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:eh POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:eh%>t POST-V_01 ;

LEXICON V_st/ehen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ stehen:st
+V:anden  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_st/ehen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:eh@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_st/ehen__vb_01
:eh  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:eh IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:eh  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:eh IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:eh  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:eh IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:and IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:eh SUBJ-PRS ;
:and%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:eh POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:eh%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_s/ehen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ sehen:sah
+V:%^A2Een  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_s/ehen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:%^A2E@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_s/ehen__vb_01
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2IE IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^A2IE  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2E SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2IE POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2Et POST-V_01 ;
!!
LEXICON V_schr/ecken__vblex !!= * @CODE@ schrecken:schrack
+V:%^A2Een  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_schr/ecken__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:%^A2E@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_schr/ecken__vb_01
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:%^CC2C IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2E SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut%^CC2C SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2I POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2Et POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_w/erfen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ werfen:warf
+V:%^A2Oen  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_w/erfen__vb_01 ;
+V@D.PTC@:%^A2E@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_w/erfen__vb_01
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2E SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^A2Ü SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2I POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2Et POST-V_01 ;
!!
LEXICON V_b/ersten__vblex !!= * @CODE@ bersten:barst
+V:%^A2Oen  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_b/ersten__vb_01 ;
+V@D.PTC@:%^A2E@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_b/ersten__vb_01
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^A2I POST-V_01 ; !! birst
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2E%>e  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2E SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^A2Ü SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2I POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2Et POST-V_01 ;
!!
LEXICON V_k/ennen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ kennen:kann
+V:%>t  Praf ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_k/ennen__vb_01 ;
+V@D.PTC@:%^A2E@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_k/ennen__vb_01
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT ;
:%^A2E SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^A2E SUBJ-PRT ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2E POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2E%>t POST-V_01 ;
!!
LEXICON V_s/enden__vblex !!= * @CODE@ senden:sand
+V:%>t  Praf ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V:%^A2E%>et  Praf ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:%^A2E@D.PTC@ V_s/enden__vb_01 ;
+V@D.PTC@:%^A2E@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_s/enden__vb_01
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2E  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2E IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2E IND-PRT ;
:%^A2E SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^A2E SUBJ-PRT ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2E POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2E%>e%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_/nehmen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ nehmen:n
+V:ommen  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_/nehmen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:ehm@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_/nehmen__vb_01
:ehm  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:imm IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:imm  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:ehm IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:ehm  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:ehm IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:ahm IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:ehm SUBJ-PRS ;
:ahm%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:ehm POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:ehm%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_dr/eschen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ dreschen:drosch
+V:%^O2E%>en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V:%^O2E%>t  Praf ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_dr/eschen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:%^O2E@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_dr/eschen__vb_01
:%^O2E  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^O2I IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^O2E IND-PRS-SG2 ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^O2I POST-V_01 ;
:%^O2I  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^O2E IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^O2E  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^O2E IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^O2E IND-PRT ;
:%^O2E SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^O2E SUBJ-PRT ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^O2I POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^O2E%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_/laufen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ laufen:l
+V:aufen  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_/laufen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:lauf@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_/laufen__vb_01
:auf  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:auf%^Umlaut IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:auf%^Umlaut IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:auf IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:auf  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:auf IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:ief IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:auf SUBJ-PRS ;
:ief SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:auf POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:auf%>t POST-V_01 ;
