src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs_D
erschrecken:erschrack V_schr/ecken__vblex ; !e-i-a:-ä:-e
LEXICON Verbs_D-NOge
kommen:k V_/kommen__vblex ;
treten:tratt V_tr/eten__vblex ;
wenden:wand V_s/enden__vblex ; !e-e-a/e-e-a/e
brechen:brach V_g/eben__vblex ;
brennen:brann V_k/ennen__vblex ; 
geben:gab V_g/eben__vblex ;
gelten:galt V_g/elten__vblex ; !e-i-a-ä/ö-o
gehen:g V_g/ehen__vblex ;
helfen:half V_w/erfen__vblex ;
kennen:kann V_k/ennen__vblex ;
kommen:k V_/kommen__vblex ;
laufen:l V_/laufen__vblex ;
nehmen:n V_/nehmen__vblex ;
nennen:nann V_k/ennen__vblex ;
sehen:sah V_s/ehen__vblex ; !e-ie-a-ä-e
senden:sand V_s/enden__vblex ;
sprechen:sprach V_spr/echen__vblex ;
stehen:st V_st/ehen__vblex ;
treffen:traff V_schr/ecken__vblex ;
treten:tratt V_tr/eten__vblex ;
wenden:wand V_s/enden__vblex ; !e-e-a/e-e-a/e
werfen:warf V_w/erfen__vblex ;
LEXICON VERBS_01
herausbekommen:herausbek V_/kommen__vblex ;
wegbekommen:wegbek V_/kommen__vblex ;
wiederbekommen:wiederbek V_/kommen__vblex ;
zurückbekommen:zurückbek V_/kommen__vblex ;
wenden:wand V_s/enden__vblex ; !e-e-a/e-e-a/e
bersten:barst V_b/ersten__vblex ; !e-i-a-ä-o
gelten:galt V_g/elten__vblex ; !e-i-a-ä/ö-o
helfen:half V_w/erfen__vblex ;
kennen:kann V_k/ennen__vblex ; !e-e-a-e-a
nennen:nann V_k/ennen__vblex ;
sehen:sah V_s/ehen__vblex ; !e-ie-a-ä-e
schrecken:schrack V_schr/ecken__vblex ; !e-i-a:-ä:-e
sprechen:sprach V_spr/echen__vblex ; !e-i-a-ä-o
sterben:starb V_spr/echen__vblex ; !e-i-a-ä-o
dreschen:drosch V_dr/eschen__vblex ; !e-i-o-ö-o
stehen:st V_st/ehen__vblex ; !e-e-a-ä-a
brennen:brann V_k/ennen__vblex ; 
geben:gab V_g/eben__vblex ; !e-i-a-ä-e
gehen:g V_g/ehen__vblex ; !e-e-i-i-a
kommen:k V_/kommen__vblex ;
laufen:l V_/laufen__vblex ;
nehmen:n V_/nehmen__vblex ;
senden:sand V_s/enden__vblex ;
treffen:traff V_schr/ecken__vblex ; !e-i-a:-ä:-e
treten:tratt V_tr/eten__vblex ; !e-i-a-ä-e
werfen:warf V_w/erfen__vblex ; ! e-i-a-ü-o
brechen:brach V_g/eben__vblex ;
